Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1721
Mobile massage therapy establishment license; renewal; procedure; insurance.

The procedure for renewing a mobile massage therapy establishment license shall be in accordance with section 38-143, except that in addition to all other requirements, the establishment shall submit evidence of minimal property damage, bodily injury, and liability insurance coverage for the establishment and evidence of coverage which meets the requirements of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act for the establishment.

Laws 2019, LB244, § 10.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.